Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-404
Privilege of leaving jail; prisoner; liable for costs.

Every prisoner granted the privilege of leaving the jail as set forth in sections 47-401 to 47-411 shall be liable for such costs incident to his confinement as the court deems appropriate and reasonable, if such costs are specifically set forth in the order of the court granting the privilege pursuant to sections 47-401 to 47-411.

Laws 1969, c. 208, § 4, p. 814.

Food and laundry, but not lodging expense, are costs incidental to confinement. State v. Towle, 197 Neb. 494, 249 N.W.2d 754 (1977).